tests/variable forms - underlying n and underlying ŋ.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
      App: hfst-optimised-lookup
      Gen: ../khk.autogen.hfst
      Morph: ../khk.automorf.hfst

Tests:

 "сонин /sɔnʲŋ/ = news":
    сонин /sɔnʲŋ/<n><nom> : сонин /sɔnʲŋ/
    сонин /sɔnʲŋ/<n><acc> : сонинг
    сонин /sɔnʲŋ/<n><gen> : сонингийн
    сонин /sɔnʲŋ/<n><gen> : сонины
    сонин /sɔnʲŋ/<n><abl> : сонингоос
    сонин /sɔnʲŋ/<n><abl> : сониноос
    сонин /sɔnʲŋ/<n><dat> : сонинд
    сонин /sɔnʲŋ/<n><pl><nom> : сониннгууд
    сонин /sɔnʲŋ/<n><pl><nom> : сониннууд

 "үнэн = truth":
    үнэн<n><nom> : үнэн
    үнэн<n><acc> : үнэнг
    үнэн<n><acc> : үнэнийг
    үнэн<n><gen> : үнэний
    үнэн<n><abl> : үнэнээс
    үнэн<n><dat> : үнэнд
    үнэн<n><pl><nom> : үнэнүүд
